California, session 20252026, SB1275.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 6368.4 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:6368.4. (a) On and after January July 1, 2027, and before January July 1, 2032, there are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale in this state of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, a used motor vehicle sold by a dealer or its affiliate that is exempt under subdivision (h) of Section 6295 or a new motor vehicle.(b) (1) Notwithstanding the Bradley-Burns Uniform Local Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200)) and the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), the exemption established by this section shall not apply with respect to any tax levied by a city, county, or district pursuant to, or in accordance with, either of those laws.(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the exemption established by this section shall not apply with respect to any tax levied pursuant to Section 6051.2 or 6201.2, pursuant to Section 35 of Article XIII of the California Constitution, or any tax levied pursuant to Section 6051 or 6201 that is deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Local Revenue Fund 2011 pursuant to Section 6051.15 or 6201.15.(c) Section 41 shall not apply to this exemption.(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, 2033, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 10752.3 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:10752.3. (a) On and after January July 1, 2027, and before January July 1, 2032, upon the sale of a used motor vehicle sold by a dealer or its affiliate that is exempt under subdivision (h) of Section 6295 or the first sale of a new motor vehicle to a consumer, in addition to the license fees imposed by this part, there shall be an additional license fee equal to the amount of the tax the purchaser would have paid but for Section 6368.4 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. 3.9375 percent of the gross receipts from the sale.(b) The dealer shall collect the license fee imposed by subdivision (a) as a separate line item, and remit the funds in the same manner as fees imposed pursuant to this article.(c) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall report amounts collected pursuant to this section to the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration and deposited in the General Fund pursuant to subdivision (d) on or before the last month following the close of a calendar quarter.(d) Notwithstanding Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11001) or any other law to the contrary, all revenues, including penalties, less refunds, derived from fees collected pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deposited in the General Fund.(e) This section shall not be construed to alter the rates of other license fees imposed under this chapter, including, but not limited to, Section 10752. (e)(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, 2033, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 3. This act provides for a tax levy within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect.